California, session 20252026, AB1775.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 115.4 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:115.4. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, on and after July 1, 2016, a board within the department shall expedite, and may assist, the initial licensure process for an applicant who supplies satisfactory evidence to the board that the applicant has served as an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States and was honorably discharged or received a discharge solely as a result of Executive Order No. 14183 issued on January 27, 2025.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, on and after July 1, 2024, a board within the department shall expedite, and may assist, the initial licensure process for an applicant who supplies satisfactory evidence to the board that the applicant is an active duty member of a regular component of the Armed Forces of the United States enrolled in the United States Department of Defense SkillBridge program as authorized under Section 1143(e) of Title 10 of the United States Code.(c) A board may adopt regulations necessary to administer this section in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(d) For purposes of this section, the term “applicant” refers to an applicant for an individual license and does not refer to applicants for business or entity licenses.SEC. 2. Section 115.8 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:115.8. The Department of Consumer Affairs shall compile information on military and spouse licensure into an annual report for the Legislature, which shall be submitted in conformance with Section 9795 of the Government Code. The report shall include all of the following for each license type of each board:(a) The number of applications for a temporary license submitted by military spouses per fiscal year, pursuant to Section 115.6.(b) The number of applications for expedited licenses received from honorably discharged military members and military spouses, or those who received a discharge solely as a result of Executive Order No. 14183 issued on January 27, 2025, pursuant to Sections 115.4 and 115.5.(c) The number of licenses issued and denied per fiscal year pursuant to Sections 115.4, 115.5, and 115.6.(d) The number of licenses issued pursuant to Section 115.6 that were suspended or revoked per fiscal year.(e) The number of applications for waived renewal fees received and granted pursuant to Section 114.3 per fiscal year.(f) The average length of time between application and issuance of licenses pursuant to Sections 115.4, 115.5, and 115.6.SEC. 3. Section 885 of the Military and Veterans Code is amended to read:885. (a) The department shall establish the Veteran’s Military Discharge Upgrade Grant Program to help fund service providers who, at no cost, will educate veterans about discharge upgrades and assist qualifying veterans in filing discharge upgrade applications.(b) The department shall develop criteria, procedures, and accountability measures as may be necessary to implement the grant program. The department shall prioritize veteran recipients who are able to demonstrate their less than honorable characterization of service was connected to a mental health condition, traumatic brain injury, sexual assault or harassment, or sexual orientation or who are able to demonstrate their characterization of service was connected to gender identity.(c) Funding for the grant program is subject to appropriation by the Legislature.(d) The department may adopt regulations as necessary to implement this section.SEC. 4. Section 886 is added to the Military and Veterans Code, to read:886. (a) The department shall establish the Veteran’s Housing and Supportive Services Grant Program to help fund service providers who, for at no cost, will provide housing supports for veterans being discharged from service.(b) The department shall develop criteria, procedures, and accountability measures as may be necessary to implement the grant program. The department shall prioritize veteran recipients who are able to demonstrate their less than honorable characterization of service was connected to a mental health condition, traumatic brain injury, sexual assault or harassment, or sexual orientation or who are able to demonstrate their characterization of service was connected to gender identity.(c) Funding for the grant program is subject to appropriations appropriation by the Legislature.(d) The department may adopt regulations as necessary to implement this section.